Washington statutes.
RCW 35.50.240

Procedure—Pleadings and evidence.

In foreclosing local improvement assessment liens, the assessment roll and the ordinance confirming it, or duly authenticated copies thereof shall be prima facie evidence of the regularity and legality of the proceedings connected therewith and the burden of proof shall be on the defendants.

[ 1982 c 91 s 4; 1965 c 7 s 35.50.240. Prior: 1933 c 9 s 2, part; RRS s 9386-1, part.]

NOTES:

Severability—1982 c 91: See note following RCW 35.50.030.